Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GREATER MINNESOTA HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the bond proceeds fund to the housing development fund. $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for the Greater Minnesota Housing Infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.395. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money transferred in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end